Alabama, session 2026rs, HB452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
19 Section 1. Sections 40-9F-31 through 40-9F-33 and
20 Section 40-9F-36, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
21 follows:
22 "§40-9F-31
23 As used in this article, the following terms have the
24 following meanings:
25 (1) CERTIFIED HISTORIC STRUCTURE. A property located in
26 this state which is at least 60 years of age, unless the
27 structure is a historic structure located within the
28 boundaries of a National Monument or Park as declared by the
Page 1

boundaries of a National Monument or Park as declared by the
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
29 United States Congress or the President of the United States,
30 in which case the federal age provisions shall apply, and is
31 certified by the Alabama Historical Commission as being
32 individually listed in the National Register of Historic
33 Places, eligible for listing in the National Register of
34 Historic Places, or certified by the commission as
35 contributing to the historic significance of a Registered
36 Historic District. For applications submitted after June 1,
37 2023, a property must be 75 years of age.
38 (2) CERTIFIED REHABILITATION. Repairs or alterations to
39 a certified historic structure that is certified by the
40 commission as meeting the U.S. Secretary of the Interior's
41 Standards for Rehabilitation which meet the requirements of 26
42 U.S.C. § 47.
43 (3) COMMISSION. The Alabama Historical Commission or
44 its successor.
45 (4) COMMITTEE. The Historic Tax Credit Evaluating
46 Committee established by this article.
47 (5) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Revenue or
48 its successor.
49 (6) DISQUALIFYING USE. Any use of a certified historic
50 structure that is occupied by an owner and used exclusively as
51 a primary or secondary residence.
52 (7) OWNER. Any taxpayer filing a State of Alabama
53 income tax return or any entity that is exempt from federal
54 income taxation pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501, that owns title
55 to a qualified structure or owns a leasehold interest in a
56 qualified structure for a term of not less than 39 years. An
Page 2

qualified structure for a term of not less than 39 years. An
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
57 owner as defined herein shall not be considered a private user
58 as defined in Section 40-9A-1.
59 (8) QUALIFIED REHABILITATION EXPENDITURES. Any
60 expenditure as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 47, as amended, and
61 the related regulations thereunder, and other reasonable
62 expenses and costs expended in the rehabilitation of a
63 qualified structure. Qualified rehabilitation expenditures do
64 not include the cost of acquisition of the qualified
65 structure, the personal labor by the owner, or any cost
66 associated with the rehabilitation of an outbuilding of the
67 qualified structure, unless the outbuilding is certified by
68 the commission to contribute to the historical significance of
69 the qualified structure.
70 (9) QUALIFIED STRUCTURE. Certified historic structures
71 that are certified by the commission as meeting the
72 requirements contained in 26 U.S.C. § 47.
73 (10) REGISTERED HISTORIC DISTRICT. Any district listed
74 in the National Register of Historic Places and any district
75 that is either of the following:
76 a. Designated under Alabama or local law as containing
77 criteria that substantially achieves the purpose of preserving
78 and rehabilitating buildings of historic significance to the
79 district.
80 b. Certified by the U.S. Secretary of the Interior as
81 meeting substantially all of the requirements for the listing
82 of districts in the National Register of Historic Places.
83 (11) REHABILITATION PLAN. Construction plans and
84 specifications for the proposed rehabilitation of a qualified
Page 3

specifications for the proposed rehabilitation of a qualified
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
85 structure in sufficient detail to enable the commission to
86 evaluate compliance with the standards developed under this
87 article.
88 (12) RURAL COMMUNITIES. Communities located within
89 counties of this state that have less than 175,000 in
90 population based on the most recent federal decennial census.
91 (12)(13) SUBSTANTIAL REHABILITATION. RehabilitationFor
92 tax years 2023 through 2027, rehabilitation of a qualified
93 structure for which the qualified rehabilitation expenditures
94 exceed 50 percent of the owner's original purchase price of
95 the qualified structure or twenty-five thousand dollars
96 ($25,000), whichever is greater. For tax years 2028 through
97 2032, rehabilitation of a qualified structure for which the
98 qualified rehabilitation expenditures exceed 50 percent of the
99 owner's original purchase price of the qualified structure or
100 twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for qualified structures
101 located in rural communities and twenty-five thousand dollars
102 ($25,000) for properties located in urban communities,
103 whichever is greater.
104 (14) URBAN COMMUNITIES. Communities located within
105 counties of this state that have greater than 175,000 in
106 population based on the most recent federal decennial census."
107 "§40-9F-32
108 (a) The commission shall develop standards for the
109 approval of the substantial rehabilitation of qualified
110 structures for which a tax credit is sought. The standards
111 shall: (i) take into account whether the substantial
112 rehabilitation of a qualified structure is consistent with the
Page 4

rehabilitation of a qualified structure is consistent with the
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
113 historic character of the structure or of the Registered
114 Historic District in which the property is located; and (ii)
115 for tax years 2023 through 20272032, establish a mechanism to
116 require owners to confirm that the proposed use for the
117 qualified structure is not a disqualifying use in the
118 application, and prior to the commission's issuance of the tax
119 credit certificate for the qualified structure under Section
120 40-9F-32(d)subsection (d).
121 (b) Prior to beginning any substantial rehabilitation
122 work on a qualified structure, the owner shall submit an
123 application and rehabilitation plan to the commission and an
124 estimate of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures under
125 the rehabilitation plan;, provided, however, that the owner,
126 at its own risk, may incur qualified rehabilitation
127 expenditures no earlier than six months prior to the
128 submission of the application and rehabilitation plan that are
129 limited to architectural, engineering, and land surveying fees
130 and related soft costs and any costs related to the protection
131 of the qualified structure from deterioration.
132 (c)(1) The commission shall review the application and
133 rehabilitation plan to determine that the information
134 contained therein is complete. If the commission determines
135 that the application and rehabilitation plan are complete, the
136 commission shall recommend the project to the committee for
137 the reservation of a tax credit. If the project is approved
138 for a tax credit by the committee, the commission shall
139 reserve, for the benefit of the owner, an allocation for a tax
140 credit as provided in Section 40-9F-33, and the commission
Page 5

credit as provided in Section 40-9F-33, and the commission
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
141 shall notify the owner in writing of the amount of the
142 reservation. The reservation of tax credits does not entitle
143 the owner to an issuance of tax credits until the owner
144 complies with all other requirements of this article for the
145 issuance of the tax credits. The reservation of tax credits
146 shall be made by the commission in the order in which the
147 committee has ranked completed applications and rehabilitation
148 plans. Reservations of tax credits shall be issued by the
149 commission within a reasonable time from the filing of a
150 completed application and rehabilitation plan. Only the
151 property for which a property address, legal description, or
152 other specific location is provided in the application shall
153 be reviewed. Ownership of an entity that is the owner of
154 property contained in the application shall not be a factor in
155 the commission's review of the application and no subsequent
156 change in the ownership structure of such entity shall result
157 in the loss or rescission of a reservation of tax credits. The
158 owner shall not be permitted to request the review of another
159 property for approval in the place of the property contained
160 in the application. Any application disapproved by the
161 commission or the committee shall be removed from the review
162 process, and the commission shall notify the owner in writing
163 of the decision to remove the application. A disapproved
164 application may be resubmitted, but shall be deemed to be a
165 new submission and may be charged a new application fee. In
166 the event the reservations of tax credits equal the total
167 amount available for reservations during the tax year, all
168 owners with applications then awaiting approval or thereafter
Page 6

owners with applications then awaiting approval or thereafter
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
169 submitted shall be notified by the commission that no
170 additional tax credits shall be granted during that tax year.
171 The applications shall remain in active status from the date
172 of the original application and shall be considered for
173 recommendations of tax credits in the event that additional
174 credits become available due to rescission by the commission
175 or when a new tax year's allocation of tax credits becomes
176 available.
177 (2) Owners receiving a reservation of tax credits shall
178 commence rehabilitation, if rehabilitation has not previously
179 begun, within 18 months of the date of issuance of the written
180 notice from the commission to the owner granting the tax
181 credits. Commencement of rehabilitation shall mean that, as of
182 the date in which actual physical work contemplated by the
183 rehabilitation plan submitted with the application has begun,
184 the owner has incurred no less than 20 percent of the
185 estimated costs of rehabilitation provided in the application.
186 Within 36 months of the date of issuance of the written notice
187 from the commission to the owner granting the tax credit
188 reservation, the owner must have incurred an additional 50
189 percent of the estimated costs of rehabilitation provided in
190 the application. Within 60 months of the date of issuance of
191 the written notice from the commission to the owner granting
192 the tax credit reservation, the project must be completed.
193 Owners receiving a reservation of tax credits shall submit
194 evidence of compliance with this subsection. If the commission
195 determines that an owner has failed to comply with the
196 requirements provided under this section, the reservation of
Page 7

requirements provided under this section, the reservation of
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
197 tax credits for the owner may be rescinded and, if so, the
198 amount of tax credits shall then be included in the total
199 amount of available tax credits provided for in subsection (c)
200 of Section 40-9F-33(c), from which reservations may be
201 granted. Any owner whose reservation of tax credits are
202 rescinded shall be notified of the rescission from the
203 commission and, upon receipt of the notice, may submit a new
204 application but may be charged a new application fee.
205 (d) Following the completion of a substantial
206 rehabilitation of a qualified structure, the owner shall
207 notify the commission that the substantial rehabilitation has
208 been completed and shall certify the qualified rehabilitation
209 expenditures incurred with respect to the rehabilitation plan.
210 In addition, the owner shall provide the commission with: (i)
211 a cost and expense certification, prepared by a licensed
212 certified public accountant that is not an affiliate of the
213 owner, certifying the total qualified rehabilitation
214 expenditures and the total amount of tax credits against any
215 state tax due that is specified in this article for which the
216 owner is eligible under Section 40-9F-33; and (ii) an
217 appraisal of the qualified structure prepared by an
218 independent MAI designated and licensed real estate appraiser.
219 The commission shall review the documentation of the
220 rehabilitation and verify its compliance with the
221 rehabilitation plan. WithinFor tax years 2023 through 2027,
222 within 90 days after receipt and approval of the foregoing
223 documentation from the owner, the commission shall issue a tax
224 credit certificate in an amount equivalent to the lesser of:
Page 8

credit certificate in an amount equivalent to the lesser of:
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
225 (i) the amount of the tax credit reservation issued for the
226 project under the provisions of subsection (c); or (ii) 25
227 percent of the actual qualified rehabilitation expenditures
228 for certified historic structures. For tax years 2028 through
229 2032, within 90 days after receipt and approval of the
230 foregoing documentation from the owner, the commission shall
231 issue a tax credit certificate in an amount equivalent to the
232 lesser of: (i) the amount of the tax credit reservation issued
233 for the project under the provisions of subsection (c); (ii)
234 30 percent of the actual qualified rehabilitation expenditures
235 for certified historic structures located in rural
236 communities; or (iii) 25 percent of the actual qualified
237 rehabilitation expenditures for certified historic structures
238 located in urban communities. In the event the amount of
239 qualified rehabilitation expenditures incurred by the owner
240 would result in the issuance of an amount of tax credits in
241 excess of the amount of tax credits reserved for the owner
242 under subsection (c), the owner may apply to the commission
243 for issuance of tax credits in an amount equal to the excess.
244 Applications for issuance of tax credits in excess of the
245 amount of tax credits reserved for the owner shall be made on
246 a form prescribed by the commission and shall represent a
247 separate certificate that shall be issued, subject to all
248 provisions regarding priority provided in Section 40-9F-38.
249 (e) In order to obtain a credit against any state tax
250 due that is specified in this article, a taxpayer shall file
251 the tax credit certificate with the taxpayer's Alabama state
252 tax return.
Page 9

tax return.
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
253 (f) The department shall grant a tax credit against any
254 state tax due that is specified in this article to a taxpayer
255 holding the tax credit certificate issued under subsection (d)
256 or, in the case of a transferee, issued by the department
257 pursuant to Section 40-9F-33 against any tax due under Chapter
258 18 in the amount stated on the tax credit certificate. The
259 department shall have the right to audit and to reassess any
260 credit improperly obtained by the owner, in accordance with
261 the Taxpayers' Bill of Rights and the Uniform Revenue
262 Procedures contained in Chapter 2A;, provided, however that
263 only the owner initially awarded the tax credit certificate,
264 and not any subsequent transferee of the tax credit
265 certificate or person to whom tax credits have been passed
266 through pursuant to Section 40-9F-33, shall be liable for any
267 credit improperly obtained by the owner.
268 (g) For processing the taxpayer's application for a tax
269 credit, the commission may impose the following application
270 fees:
271 (1) For qualified rehabilitation expenses of one
272 million dollars ($1,000,000) or less, a fee equal to 1 percent
273 of the qualified rehabilitation expenditures.
274 (2) For qualified rehabilitation expenses from one
275 million and one dollars ($1,000,001) to ten million dollars
276 ($10,000,000), a fee equal to fifteen thousand dollars
277 ($15,000).
278 (3) For qualified rehabilitation expenses over ten
279 million dollars ($10,000,000), a fee equal to twenty thousand
280 dollars ($20,000).
Page 10

dollars ($20,000).
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
281 (h) Any fees collected by the commission under this
282 section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit
283 of the commission and all such funds are to be appropriated to
284 the commission to defray the expenses incurred in carrying out
285 this article.
286 (i) The commission shall report to the Legislature in
287 the third year following passage of this article, and annually
288 thereafter, on the overall economic activity, usage, and
289 impact to the state from the substantial rehabilitation of
290 qualified structures for which tax credits have been allowed.
291 The information in the reports shall be consistent with the
292 information required by the Legislature pursuant to, and shall
293 be provided by the commission to the Legislature in accordance
294 with, Section 40-1-50, and rules adopted thereunder.
295 Information provided pursuant to this section is exempt from
296 the confidentiality provisions of Section 40-2A-10."
297 "§40-9F-33
298 (a) The state portion ofFor tax years 2023 through
299 2027, any tax credit against the tax imposed by Chapter 18 for
300 the taxable year in which the reservation is allocated to a
301 project or the certified rehabilitation is placed in service
302 shall be equal to 25 percent of the qualified rehabilitation
303 expenditures for certified historic structures. For tax years
304 2028 through 2032, any tax credit against the tax imposed by
305 Chapter 18 for the taxable year in which the reservation is
306 allocated to a project or the certified rehabilitation is
307 placed in service shall be equal to: (i) 30 percent of the
308 qualified rehabilitation expenditures for certified historic
Page 11

qualified rehabilitation expenditures for certified historic
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
309 structures located in rural communities; or (ii) 25 percent of
310 the qualified rehabilitation expenditures for certified
311 historic structures located in urban communities. No tax
312 credit claimed for any certified rehabilitation may exceed
313 five million dollars ($5,000,000) for all allowable property
314 types.
315 (b) There is created within the Education Trust Fund a
316 separate account named the Historic Preservation Income Tax
317 Credit Account. The Commissioner of Revenue shall certify to
318 the Comptroller the amount of income tax credits under this
319 section and the Comptroller shall transfer into the Historic
320 Preservation Income Tax Credit Account only the amount from
321 sales tax revenues within the Education Trust Fund that is
322 sufficient for the Department of Revenue to use to cover the
323 income tax credits for the applicable tax year. The
324 Commissioner of Revenue shall distribute the funds in the
325 Historic Preservation Income Tax Credit Account pursuant to
326 this section.
327 (c) The entire tax credit must be claimed by the
328 taxpayer for the taxable year in which the reservation is
329 allocated to a project or the certified rehabilitation is
330 placed in service. Tax credits shall not be claimed prior to
331 the taxable year in which the certified rehabilitation is
332 placed in service. Where the taxes owed by the taxpayer are
333 less than the tax credit, the taxpayer shall be entitled to
334 claim a refund for the difference. In the event that any
335 additional credit is allocated to the taxpayer for a given
336 project, the additional credit must be claimed in the taxable
Page 12

project, the additional credit must be claimed in the taxable
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
337 year the additional credit is allocated to the taxpayer.
338 (d)(1) For the tax years 2018 through 2022, the
339 aggregate amount of all tax credits that may be reserved in
340 any one of such years by the commission and certification of
341 rehabilitation plans under Section 40-9F-32(c) shall not
342 exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), plus any amount
343 of previous reservations of tax credits that were rescinded
344 under Section 40-9F-32(c) during the tax year. However, if all
345 of the allowable tax credit amount for any tax year is not
346 requested and reserved, any unreserved tax credits may be
347 utilized by the commission in awarding tax credits in
348 subsequent years; provided, however, that in no event shall a
349 total of more than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000)
350 be reserved by the commission during the period from May 25,
351 2017, through December 31, 2022, pursuant to this article.
352 Applications shall not be received by the commission after the
353 Historic Tax Credit Evaluating Committee has ranked projects
354 with a total amount exceeding two hundred million dollars
355 ($200,000,000).
356 (2) For the tax years 2023 through 2027, the aggregate
357 amount of all tax credits that may be reserved in any one of
358 such years by the commission and certification of
359 rehabilitation plans under Section 40-9F-32(c) shall not
360 exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), plus any amount
361 of previous reservations of tax credits that were rescinded
362 under Section 40-9F-32(c) during the tax year. However, if all
363 of the allowable tax credit amount for any tax year is not
364 requested and reserved, any unreserved tax credits may be
Page 13

requested and reserved, any unreserved tax credits may be
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
365 utilized by the commission in awarding tax credits in
366 subsequent years;, provided, however, that in no event shall a
367 total of more than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000)
368 be reserved by the commission during the period from May 25,
369 2017, through December 31, 2027, pursuant to this article.
370 (3) For the tax years 2028 through 2032, the aggregate
371 amount of all tax credits that may be reserved in any one of
372 such years by the commission and certification of
373 rehabilitation plans under Section 40-9F-32(c) shall not
374 exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), plus any
375 amount of previous reservations of tax credits that were
376 rescinded under Section 40-9F-32(c) during the tax year.
377 However, if all of the allowable tax credit amount for any tax
378 year is not requested and reserved, any unreserved tax credits
379 may be utilized by the commission in awarding tax credits in
380 subsequent years, provided that in no event shall a total of
381 more than three hundred twenty-five million dollars
382 ($325,000,000) be reserved by the commission during the period
383 from May 25, 2017, through December 31, 2032, pursuant to this
384 article.
385 (3)(4) For tax years 2023 through 20272032, no tax
386 credits shall be reserved for qualified structures the end use
387 of which is proposed to be a disqualifying use.
388 (4)(5) For purposes of this article, "tax year" shall
389 mean calendar year.
390 (5)(6) In addition to the limits in subdivision (2),
391 for tax years 2024 through 20272032, the commission may
392 utilize an additional amount up to a total of five million
Page 14

utilize an additional amount up to a total of five million
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
393 dollars ($5,000,000) to reduce the backlog of qualified
394 applications.
395 (e) Of the annual amount of the tax credits provided
396 for in subsection (d), 40 percent shall be reserved to
397 taxpayers with a certified rehabilitation project located in a
398 county in which the population does not exceed 175,000
399 according to the most recent federal decennial census. In the
400 event applications are not received and credits are not
401 allocated for projects in these areas by the close of the
402 third quarter of the program year, the funds may revert for
403 allocations of other project applications.
404 (f) Tax credits granted to a partnership, a limited
405 liability company, S corporations, trusts, or estates, shall
406 be claimed at the entity level and shall not pass through to
407 the partners, members, or owners.
408 (g) All or any portion of the income tax credits under
409 this section and Section 40-9F-32 shall be transferable and
410 assignable, subject to any notice and verification
411 requirements to be determined by the department, without the
412 requirement of transferring any ownership interest in the
413 qualified structure or any interest in the entity which owns
414 the qualified structure. Any tax credits transferred shall be
415 at a value of at least 85 percent of the present value of the
416 credits. However, once a credit is transferred, only the
417 transferee may utilize the credit and the credit may not be
418 transferred again. A transferee of the tax credits may use the
419 amount of tax credits transferred to offset any income tax
420 under Chapter 18. The entire tax credit must be claimed by the
Page 15

under Chapter 18. The entire tax credit must be claimed by the
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
421 transferee for the taxable year in which the reservation is
422 allocated to a project or the certified rehabilitation is
423 placed in service. When the taxes owed by the transferee are
424 less than the tax credit, the transferee shall be entitled to
425 claim a refund for the difference. The department shall adopt
426 a form transfer statement to be filed by the transferor with
427 the department prior to the purported transfer of any credit
428 issued under this article. The transfer statement form shall
429 include the name and federal taxpayer identification number of
430 the transferor and each transferee listed therein along with
431 the amount of the tax credit to be transferred to each
432 transferee listed on the form. The transfer statement form
433 shall also contain any other information as the department may
434 from time to time reasonably require. For each transfer, the
435 transferor shall file: (1)(i) a completed transfer statement
436 form; (2)(ii) a copy of the tax credit certificate issued by
437 the commission documenting the amount of tax credits which the
438 transferor intends to transfer; (3)(iii) a copy of the
439 proposed written transfer agreement; and (4)(iv) a transfer
440 fee payable to the department in the amount of one thousand
441 dollars ($1,000) per transferee listed on the transfer
442 statement form. The transferor shall file with the department
443 a fully executed copy of the written transfer agreement with
444 each transferee within 30 days after the completed transfer.
445 Filing of the written transfer agreement with the department
446 shall perfect the transfer with respect to the transferee.
447 Within 30 days after the department's receipt of the fully
448 executed written transfer agreement, the department shall
Page 16

executed written transfer agreement, the department shall
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
449 issue a tax credit certificate to each transferee listed in
450 the agreement in the amount of the tax credit so transferred.
451 The certificate shall be used by the transferee in claiming
452 the tax credit pursuant to subsections (e) and (f) of Section
453 40-9F-32(e) and (f). The department may adopt additional rules
454 as are necessary to permit verification of the ownership of
455 the tax credits, but shall not adopt any rules which unduly
456 restrict or hinder the transfer of the tax credits."
457 "§40-9F-36
458 The tax credits authorized by this article for the
459 substantial rehabilitation of qualified structures shall not
460 be available to owners of qualified structures that submit an
461 application and rehabilitation plan after December 31,
462 20272032. No action or inaction on the part of the Legislature
463 shall reduce or suspend the tax credits authorized by this
464 article in any past or future calendar year with respect to a
465 qualified structure if the owner thereof submits an
466 application and rehabilitation plan with the commission and
467 the commission reserves an allocation for a tax credit on or
468 prior to December 31, 20272032, even if the qualified
469 structure is placed into service after December 31, 20272032,
470 and shall not affect the owner of a qualified structure if the
471 commission has reserved an allocation for a tax credit on or
472 prior to December 31, 20272032. Notwithstanding any other
473 provision of this chapter, any application received by the
474 commission, other than an application for a qualified
475 structure the end use of which is proposed to be a
476 disqualifying use, in active status on the ranking list of the
Page 17

disqualifying use, in active status on the ranking list of the
JP1TEYF-1 02/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-474
House Ways and Means Education Reported Substitute
for HB452
477 Historic Tax Credit Evaluating Committee or granted a tax
478 allocation reservation prior to May 14, 2021the effective date
479 of this article, shall remain on the ranking list or in
480 reservation status and shall receive a tax credit allocation
481 reservation or a tax credit allocation, as the case may be,
482 when additional credits become available, including in any tax
483 year commencing after 2022."
484 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
485 1, 2026.
Page 18